New Jersey, session 221, S4092.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of Environmental Protection or any other person authorized to enforce the provisions of chapter 4 of Title 23 of the Revised Statutes, or the State Fish and Game Code, shall not issue a violation to a trapping licensee for failure to check a trap within the required time period if the trap is located in an area subject to a law enforcement investigation and the licensee has been instructed by a federal, State, or local law enforcement agent to vacate the area. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.